Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Disclosure Requirements; Authorized Fees.

§ 55.1-1808.
Contract disclosure statement; right of cancellation.

For purposes of this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Delivery” means that the disclosure packet is delivered to the purchaser or purchaser’s authorized agent by one of the methods specified in this section.“Purchaser’s authorized agent” means any person designated by such purchaser in a ratified real estate contract for purchase and sale of residential real property or other writing designating such agent.“Ratified real estate contract” includes any addendum to such contract.“Receives,” “received,” or “receiving” the disclosure packet means that the purchaser or purchaser’s authorized agent has received the disclosure packet by one of the methods specified in this section.“Seller’s authorized agent” means a person designated by such seller in a ratified real estate contract for purchase and sale of residential real property or other writing designating such agent.

Subject to the provisions of subsection A of §

55.1-1814

, an owner selling a lot shall disclose in the contract that (i) the lot is located within a development that is subject to the Property Owners’ Association Act (§

55.1-1800

et seq.); (ii) the Property Owners’ Association Act (§

55.1-1800

et seq.) requires the seller to obtain from the property owners’ association an association disclosure packet and provide it to the purchaser; (iii) the purchaser may cancel the contract within three days, or up to seven days if extended by the ratified real estate contract, after receiving the association disclosure packet or being notified that the association disclosure packet will not be available; (iv) if the purchaser has received the association disclosure packet, the purchaser has a right to request an update of such disclosure packet in accordance with subsection G of §

55.1-1810

or subsection D of §

55.1-1811

, as appropriate; and (v) the right to receive the association disclosure packet and the right to cancel the contract are waived conclusively if not exercised before settlement.For purposes of clause (iii), the association disclosure packet shall be deemed not to be available if (a) a current annual report has not been filed by the association with either the State Corporation Commission pursuant to §

13.1-936

or the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

55.1-1835

, (b) the seller has made a written request to the association that the packet be provided and no such packet has been received within 14 days in accordance with subsection A of §

55.1-1809

, or (c) written notice has been provided by the association that a packet is not available.

If the contract does not contain the disclosure required by subsection B, the purchaser’s sole remedy is to cancel the contract prior to settlement.

The information contained in the association disclosure packet shall be current as of a date specified on the association disclosure packet prepared in accordance with this section; however, a disclosure packet update or financial update may be requested in accordance with subsection G or H of §

55.1-1810

or subsection D or E of §

55.1-1811

, as appropriate. The purchaser may cancel the contract (i) within three days, or up to seven days if extended by the ratified real estate contract, after the date of the contract if, on or before the date that the purchaser signs the contract, the purchaser receives the association disclosure packet, is notified that the association disclosure packet will not be available, or receives an association disclosure packet that is not in conformity with the provisions of §

55.1-1809

; (ii) within three days, or up to seven days if extended by the ratified real estate contract, after receiving the association disclosure packet if the association disclosure packet, notice that the association disclosure packet will not be available, or an association disclosure packet that is not in conformity with the provisions of §

55.1-1809

is hand delivered, delivered by electronic means, or delivered by a commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt is obtained; or (iii) within six days, or up to 10 days if extended by the ratified real estate contract, after the postmark date if the association disclosure packet, notice that the association disclosure packet will not be available, or an association disclosure packet that is not in conformity with the provisions of §

55.1-1809

is sent to the purchaser by United States mail. The purchaser also may cancel the contract at any time prior to settlement if the purchaser has not been notified that the association disclosure packet will not be available and the association disclosure packet is not delivered to the purchaser.Notice of cancellation shall be provided to the lot owner or his agent by one of the following methods:

Hand delivery;

United States mail, postage prepaid, provided that the sender retains sufficient proof of mailing in the form of a certificate of service prepared by the sender confirming such mailing;

Electronic means, provided that the sender retains sufficient proof of the electronic delivery, which may be in the form of an electronic receipt of delivery, a confirmation that the notice was sent by facsimile, or a certificate of service prepared by the sender confirming the electronic delivery; or

Overnight delivery using a commercial service or the United States Postal Service.In the event of a dispute, the sender shall have the burden to demonstrate delivery of the notice of cancellation. Such cancellation shall be without penalty, and the seller shall cause any deposit to be returned promptly to the purchaser.

Whenever any contract is canceled based on a failure to comply with subsection B or D or pursuant to subsection C, any deposit or escrowed funds shall be returned within 30 days of the cancellation, unless the parties to the contract specify in writing a shorter period.

Any rights of the purchaser to cancel the contract provided by this chapter are waived if not exercised prior to settlement.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, the provisions of this section and §

55.1-1809

may not be varied by agreement, and the rights conferred by this section and §

55.1-1809

may not be waived.

Unless otherwise provided in the ratified real estate contract or other writing, delivery to the purchaser’s authorized agent shall require delivery to such agent and not to a person other than such agent. Delivery of the disclosure packet may be made by the lot owner or the lot owner’s authorized agent.

If the lot is governed by more than one association, the purchaser’s right of cancellation may be exercised within the required time frames following delivery of the last disclosure packet or resale certificate.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.4; 2010, c. 165; 2014, c. 216; 2016, c. 471; 2017, cc. 387, 405; 2018, c. 226; 2019, cc. 364, 513, 712; 2020, cc. 121, 592, 605.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 364 and 513 amended § 55-509.4 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section in the third sentence of subsection D, by substituting a comma for “or” following “receives the association disclosure packet” and inserting “or receives an association disclosure packet that is not in conformity with the provisions of §

55.1-1809

” in clause (i); substituting a comma for “or ” following “if the association disclosure packet” and inserting “, or an association disclosure packet that is not in conformity with the provisions of §

55.1-1809

”” in clause (ii); and substituting a comma for “or” following “if the association disclosure packet” and inserting “, or an association disclosure packet that is not in conformity with the provisions of § 55.1-1809” in clause (iii).

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1809

” for “§ 55-509.6.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 121 and 605 are identical, and in subsection A, added the definition for “Ratified real estate contract”; in clause (iii) of subsection B and in clauses (i) and (ii) of subsection D, inserted “or up to seven days if extended by the ratified real estate contract”; and in clause (iii) of subsection D, inserted “or up to 10 days if extended by the ratified real estate contract.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 592, in subsection B, substituted “subsection G” for “subsection H” in the first paragraph in clause (iv); and in subsection D, inserted “or H” and “or E” in the first paragraph in the first sentence.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

No right to rescind based on updates. —

Clause (iii) of subsection A permits a real estate purchaser to cancel a contract within three days after receiving a Property Owners’ Association Act disclosure packet, or upon notice that a packet will not be available. That same section also permits a purchaser who has received a packet to request an update in clause (iv) of subsection A. However, a plain reading of the statute shows that the purchaser has no direct right under this clause to rescind the contract based on requested updates. Daly v. Gulick Grp., Inc., 99 Va. Cir. 186, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 75 (Fairfax County May 11, 2018).

Nowhere does § 55-509.4 give a purchaser the right to rescind a purchase contract if he requests an update to a disclosure packet and the seller or homeowners’ association fails to timely provide the update, or if the packet is incomplete. Daly v. Gulick Grp., Inc., 99 Va. Cir. 186, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 75 (Fairfax County May 11, 2018).

Cancellation under subsection C. —

Last sentence of subsection C of § 55-509.4 allows the purchaser to cancel the contract at any time prior to settlement if the purchaser has not been notified that the association disclosure packet will not be available and the association disclosure packet is not delivered to the purchaser. This sentence predicates a rescission right on (1) a lack of notification of unavailability and (2) non-deliverability. It applies to those cases where a purchaser gets nothing from the seller. Daly v. Gulick Grp., Inc., 99 Va. Cir. 186, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 75 (Fairfax County May 11, 2018).

Subsection C of § 55-509.4 simply references the means in which a disclosure packet update or financial update may be requested. The rest of subsection C lists out the means by which a purchaser may cancel the contract, none of which relate to a request for an updated packet. The fact that the legislature provides a mechanism for requesting a disclosure packet does not act to create a new contractual rescission period unless the legislature expressly says so by its statute. In this case, the legislature has not provided rescission as a remedy when a purchaser receives an outdated or incomplete disclosure package. Daly v. Gulick Grp., Inc., 99 Va. Cir. 186, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 75 (Fairfax County May 11, 2018).

Relief not warranted. —

Seller’s demurrer was sustained as to the purchasers’ breach of contract, declaratory relief, and rescission claims where the seller had delivered a disclosure packet, albeit one that was allegedly outdated or incomplete, and the purchasers had not unilaterally cancelled the contract within three days of delivery. Daly v. Gulick Grp., Inc., 99 Va. Cir. 186, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 75 (Fairfax County May 11, 2018).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Homeowners association may limit units offered for rent by single owner. —

If properly written, adopted and enforced, authorized as to purpose and not in conflict with an association’s declarations, bylaws or rules and regulations, a homeowners’ association may covenant to limit the number of housing units within the association that may be offered for rent by the owner to tenants. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kathy J. Byron, Member, House of Delegates, 10-078,
(01/24/11).

§ 55.1-1809.
Contents of association disclosure packet; delivery of packet.

Within 14 days after receipt of a written request and instructions by a seller or the seller’s authorized agent, the association, the association’s managing agent, or any third party preparing an association disclosure packet on behalf of the association shall deliver an association disclosure packet as directed in the written request. The information contained in the association disclosure packet shall be current as of a date specified on the association disclosure packet. If hand or electronically delivered, the written request is deemed received on the date of delivery. If sent by United States mail, the request is deemed received six days after the postmark date. An association disclosure packet shall contain the following:

The name of the association and, if incorporated, the state in which the association is incorporated and the name and address of its registered agent in the Commonwealth;

A statement of any expenditure of funds approved by the association or the board of directors that requires an assessment in addition to the regular assessment during the current year or the immediately succeeding fiscal year;

A statement, including the amount of all assessments and any other mandatory fees or charges currently imposed by the association, together with any post-closing fee charged by the common interest community manager, if any, and associated with the purchase, disposition, and maintenance of the lot and to the right of use of common areas, and the status of the account;

A statement of whether there is any other entity or facility to which the lot owner may be liable for fees or other charges;

The current reserve study report or summary of such report, a statement of the status and amount of any reserve or replacement fund, and any portion of the fund allocated by the board of directors for a specified project;

A copy of the association’s current budget or a summary of such budget, prepared by the association, and a copy of its statement of income and expenses or statement of its financial position (balance sheet) for the last fiscal year for which such statement is available, including a statement of the balance due of any outstanding loans of the association;

A statement of the nature and status of any pending action or unpaid judgment (i) to which the association is a party and (ii) that could or would have a material impact on the association or its members or that relates to the lot being purchased;

A statement setting forth the insurance coverage that is provided for all lot owners by the association, including the fidelity coverage maintained by the association, and any additional insurance that is required or recommended for each lot owner;

A statement that any improvement or alteration made to the lot, or uses made of the lot or common area assigned to such lot, is or is not in violation of the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, architectural guidelines, and articles of incorporation, if any, of the association;

A statement setting forth any restriction, limitation, or prohibition on the right of a lot owner to place a sign on the owner’s lot advertising the lot for sale;

A statement setting forth any restriction, limitation, or prohibition on the right of a lot owner to display any flag on the owner’s lot, including reasonable restrictions as to the size, place, and manner of placement or display of such flag and the installation of any flagpole or similar structure necessary to display such flag;

A statement setting forth any restrictions as to the size, place, duration, or manner of placement or display of political signs by a lot owner on his lot;

A statement setting forth any restriction, limitation, or prohibition on the right of a lot owner to install or use solar energy collection devices on the owner’s property;

A copy of the current declaration, the association’s articles of incorporation and bylaws, and any rules and regulations or architectural guidelines adopted by the association;

A copy of any approved minutes of the board of directors and association meetings for the six calendar months preceding the request for the disclosure packet;

A copy of the notice given to the lot owner by the association of any current or pending rule or architectural violation;

A copy of the fully completed form developed by the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

54.1-2350

;

Certification that the association has filed with the Common Interest Community Board the annual report required by §

55.1-1835

. Such certification shall indicate the filing number assigned by the Common Interest Community Board and the expiration date of such filing; and

A statement indicating any known project approvals currently in effect issued by secondary mortgage market agencies.

Failure to receive copies of an association disclosure packet shall not excuse any failure to comply with the provisions of the declaration, articles of incorporation, bylaws, or rules or regulations.

The disclosure packet shall be delivered in accordance with the written request and instructions of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, including whether the disclosure packet shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy, and shall specify the complete contact information for the parties to whom the disclosure packet shall be delivered. The disclosure packet required by this section shall not, in and of itself, be deemed a security as defined in §

13.1-501

.

The seller or the seller’s authorized agent may request that the disclosure packet be provided in hard copy or in electronic form. An association or common interest community manager may provide the disclosure packet electronically; however, the seller or the seller’s authorized agent shall have the right to request that the association disclosure packet be provided in hard copy. The seller or the seller’s authorized agent shall continue to have the right to request a hard copy of the disclosure packet in person at the principal place of business of the association. If the seller or the seller’s authorized agent requests that the disclosure packet be provided in electronic format, neither the association nor its common interest community manager may require the seller or the seller’s authorized agent to pay any fees to use the provider’s electronic network or system. The disclosure packet shall not be delivered in hard copy if the requester has requested delivery of such disclosure packet electronically. If the disclosure packet is provided electronically by a website link, the preparer shall not cause the website link to expire within the subsequent 90-day period. The preparer shall not charge another fee during the subsequent 12-month period, except that the preparer may charge an update fee for a financial update or for an inspection as provided in §

55.1-1810

. If the seller or the seller’s authorized agent asks that the disclosure packet be provided in electronic format, the seller or the seller’s authorized agent may request that an electronic copy be provided to each of the following named in the request: the seller, the seller’s authorized agent, the purchaser, the purchaser’s authorized agent, and not more than one other person designated by the requester. If so requested, the property owners’ association or its common interest community manager may require the seller or the seller’s authorized agent to pay the fee specified in §

55.1-1810

. Regardless of whether the disclosure packet is delivered in paper form or electronically, the preparer of the disclosure packet shall provide such disclosure packet directly to the persons designated by the requester to the addresses or, if applicable, the email addresses provided by the requester.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.5; 2013, cc. 357, 492; 2015, c. 277; 2016, c. 471; 2018, c. 70; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 441; 2022, cc. 65, 66.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 441 inserted subdivision A 12 and renumbered accordingly.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 65 and 66 are identical, and inserted “the association’s managing agent, or any third party preparing an association disclosure packet on behalf of the association” in subsection A in the introductory language; and made a stylistic change.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Adequacy of disclosure package. —

Buyers did not have the right to terminate their contract with the seller to purchase a home, even if the disclosure packet given to them was inadequate because it did not contain certain documents. Statutory law gave the buyers three days from the time they received the disclosure packet, be it adequate or inadequate, to terminate the sales agreement, and, thus, their attempt to terminate it four months after receipt of the disclosure packet and signing of the sale agreement was invalid since they had not timely attempted to cancel the sales agreement.
Davis v. Horton, 63 Va. Cir. 621, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 435 (Fairfax County Mar. 12, 2002) (decided under prior law).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinions cited below refer to prior law.

A retirement community developer is required to provide to potential buyers a disclosure statement

reflecting the financial status of the community’s homeowners’ association. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 01-111,
(4/17/02).

Restrictive covenants must be reasonable. —

Property Owners’ Association’s restrictive covenant limiting the use of lots in residential areas for residential purposes exclusively is enforceable, subject to the exception that a home office that does not generate customer or client traffic is deemed a residential use. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable R. Lee Ware, Member, House of Delegates, 16-029,
(1/18/17).

§ 55.1-1810.
Fees for disclosure packet; professionally managed associations.

A professionally managed association or its common interest community manager may charge certain fees as authorized by this section for the inspection of the property, the preparation and issuance of the disclosure packet required by §

55.1-1809

, and for such other services as set out in this section. The seller or the seller’s authorized agent shall specify in writing whether the disclosure packet shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy, at the option of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, and shall specify the complete contact information for the parties to whom the disclosure packet shall be delivered.

A reasonable fee may be charged by the preparer as follows:

For the inspection of the exterior of the dwelling unit and the lot, as authorized in the declaration and as required to prepare the association disclosure packet, a fee not to exceed $100;

For the preparation and delivery of the disclosure packet in (i) paper format, a fee not to exceed $150 for no more than two hard copies or (ii) electronic format, a fee not to exceed a total of $125 for an electronic copy to each of the following named in the request: the seller, the seller’s authorized agent, the purchaser, the purchaser’s authorized agent, and not more than one other person designated by the requester. The preparer of the disclosure packet shall provide the disclosure packet directly to the designated persons. Only one fee shall be charged for the preparation and delivery of the disclosure packet;

At the option of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, with the consent of the association or the common interest community manager, for expediting the inspection, preparation, and delivery of the disclosure packet, an additional expedite fee not to exceed $50;

At the option of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, for an additional hard copy of the disclosure packet, a fee not to exceed $25 per hard copy;

At the option of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, for hand delivery or overnight delivery of the overnight disclosure packet, a fee not to exceed an amount equal to the actual cost paid to a third-party commercial delivery service; and

A post-closing fee to the purchaser of the property, collected at settlement, for the purpose of establishing the purchaser as the owner of the property in the records of the association, a fee not to exceed $50.Except as otherwise provided in subsection E, neither the association nor its common interest community manager shall require cash, check, certified funds, or credit card payments at the time the request for the disclosure packet is made. The disclosure packet shall state that all fees and costs for the disclosure packet shall be the personal obligation of the lot owner and shall be an assessment against the lot and collectible as any other assessment in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and §

55.1-1833

, if not paid at settlement or within 60 days of the delivery of the disclosure packet, whichever occurs first.For purposes of this section, an expedite fee shall be charged only if the inspection and preparation of delivery of the disclosure packet are completed within five business days of the request for a disclosure packet.

No fees other than those specified in this section, and as limited by this section, shall be charged by the association or its common interest community manager for compliance with the duties and responsibilities of the association under this chapter. No additional fee shall be charged for access to the association’s or common interest community manager’s website. The association or its common interest community manager shall publish and make available in paper or electronic format, or both, a schedule of the applicable fees so the seller or the seller’s authorized agent will know such fees at the time of requesting the packet.

Any fees charged pursuant to this section shall be collected at the time of settlement on the sale of the lot and shall be due and payable out of the settlement proceeds in accordance with this section. The settlement agent shall escrow a sum sufficient to pay such costs of the seller at settlement. The seller shall be responsible for all costs associated with the preparation and delivery of the association disclosure packet, except for the costs of any disclosure packet update or financial update, which costs shall be the responsibility of the requester, payable at settlement. Neither the association nor its common interest community manager shall require cash, check, certified funds, or credit card payments at the time the request is made for the association disclosure packet.

If settlement does not occur within 60 days of the delivery of the disclosure packet, or funds are not collected at settlement and disbursed to the association or the common interest community manager, all fees, including those costs that would have otherwise been the responsibility of the purchaser or settlement agent, shall be (i) assessed within one year after delivery of the disclosure packet against the lot owner, (ii) the personal obligation of the lot owner, and (iii) an assessment against the lot and collectible as any other assessment in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and §

55.1-1834

. The seller may pay the association by cash, check, certified funds, or credit card, if credit card payment is an option offered by the association. The association shall pay the common interest community manager the amount due from the lot owner within 30 days after invoice.

The maximum allowable fees charged in accordance with this section shall adjust every five years, as of January 1 of that year, in an amount equal to the annual increases for that five-year period in the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor.

If an association disclosure packet has been issued for a lot within the preceding 12-month period, a person specified in the written instructions of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, including the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, or the purchaser or his authorized agent may request a disclosure packet update. The requester shall specify whether the disclosure packet update shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy and shall specify the complete contact information of the parties to whom the update shall be delivered. The disclosure packet update shall be delivered within 10 days of the written request.

The settlement agent may request a financial update. The requester shall specify whether the financial update shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy and shall specify the complete contact information of the parties to whom the update shall be delivered. The financial update shall be delivered within three business days of the written request.

A reasonable fee for the disclosure packet update or financial update may be charged by the preparer not to exceed $50. At the option of the purchaser or the purchaser’s authorized agent, the requester may request that the association or the common interest community manager perform an additional inspection of the exterior of the dwelling unit and the lot, as authorized in the declaration, for a fee not to exceed $100. Any fees charged for the specified update shall be collected at the time settlement occurs on the sale of the property. The settlement agent shall escrow a sum sufficient to pay such costs of the seller at settlement. Neither the association nor its common interest community manager, if any, shall require cash, check, certified funds, or credit card payments at the time the request is made for the disclosure packet update. The requester may request that the specified update be provided in hard copy or in electronic form.

No association or common interest community manager may require the requester to request the specified update electronically. The seller or the seller’s authorized agent shall continue to have the right to request a hard copy of the specified update in person at the principal place of business of the association. If the requester asks that the specified update be provided in electronic format, neither the association nor its common interest community manager may require the requester to pay any fees to use the provider’s electronic network or system. A copy of the specified update shall be provided to the seller or the seller’s authorized agent.

When an association disclosure packet has been delivered as required by §

55.1-1809

, the association shall, as to the purchaser, be bound by the statements set forth in the disclosure packet as to the status of the assessment account and the status of the lot with respect to any violation of the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, architectural guidelines, and articles of incorporation, if any, of the association as of the date of the statement unless the purchaser had actual knowledge that the contents of the disclosure packet were in error.

If the association or its common interest community manager has been requested in writing to furnish the association disclosure packet required by §

55.1-1809

, failure to provide the association disclosure packet substantially in the form provided in this section shall be deemed a waiver of any claim for delinquent assessments or of any violation of the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, or architectural guidelines existing as of the date of the request with respect to the subject lot. The preparer of the association disclosure packet shall be liable to the seller in an amount equal to the actual damages sustained by the seller in an amount not to exceed $1,000. The purchaser shall nevertheless be obligated to abide by the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, and architectural guidelines of the association as to all matters arising after the date of the settlement of the sale.

The Common Interest Community Board may assess a monetary penalty for failure to deliver the association disclosure packet within 14 days against any (i) property owners’ association pursuant to §

54.1-2351

or (ii) common interest community manager pursuant to §

54.1-2349

and regulations promulgated thereto, and may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to §

54.1-2352

.

No association may collect fees authorized by this section unless the association (i) is registered with the Common Interest Community Board, (ii) is current in filing the most recent annual report and fee with the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

55.1-1835

, (iii) is current in paying any assessment made by the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

54.1-2354.5

, and (iv) provides the disclosure packet electronically if so requested by the requester.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.6; 2009, c. 557; 2011, cc. 334, 577, 585; 2014, c. 216; 2015, c. 277; 2016, c. 471; 2017, cc. 387, 405; 2018, c. 226; 2019, cc. 391, 712; 2020, c. 592.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 391 amended § 55-509.6 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in the last sentence of subsection N, by inserting “and fee” and “pursuant to
§

55.1-1835

” in clause (ii) and deleting “the annual payment to the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

55.1-1835

and” following “current in paying” in clause (iii).

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1835

” for “§ 55-516.1.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592 substituted “§

54.1-2352

” for “§

54.1-2349

or

54.1-2352

, as applicable” at the end of subsection M.